Texas, session 891, HB309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subtitle B, Title 9, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Chapter 787 to read as follows: CHAPTER 787.  WEATHER ALERT RADIOS Sec. 787.001.  DEFINITIONS. In this chapter: (1)  "Campground" means a public or private property designed to provide cabins for transient guest use or areas for locating a tent, tent trailer, pickup camper, recreational vehicle, trailer, or other equipment designed for camping for transient guest use. (2)  "Hotel" has the meaning assigned by Section 792.001. (3)  "NOAA weather alert radio" means a device that is: (A)  designed to detect, receive, and provide alerts regarding warnings issued by the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration Weather Radio system; and (B)  equipped with an audible alarm capable of alerting occupants of the room in which the radio is installed of the presence of an impending weather emergency. (4)  "NOAA weather alert radio for hearing-impaired persons" means a NOAA weather alert radio that, in addition to the features of a standard NOAA weather alert radio, is equipped with a strobe light with a visible effective intensity of not less than 100 candela, as tested and labeled in accordance with ANSI/UL Standard 1638, and with a flash rate of not fewer than 60 and not more than 120 flashes per minute. (5)  "Recreational vehicle park" has the meaning assigned by Section 13.087, Water Code. Sec. 787.002.  APPLICABILITY. This chapter applies only to a campground, hotel, or recreational vehicle park that is located wholly or partly: (1)  within the boundaries of the 100-year floodplain as determined by the most recent maps published by the Federal Emergency Management Authority; or (2)  within one-quarter mile of the bank of a river or creek. Sec. 787.003.  NOAA WEATHER ALERT RADIOS REQUIRED. (a)  An operator of a campground, hotel, or recreational vehicle park to which this chapter applies shall maintain a NOAA weather alert radio in good working order in: (1)  each room of the hotel or permanent structure located on the property of the campground or recreational vehicle park that is regularly used for sleeping; and (2)  each common room or area on the property of the campground, hotel, or recreational vehicle park that is accessible to staff or members of the public. (b)  An operator of a campground, hotel, or recreational vehicle park shall, on request, provide a NOAA weather alert radio for hearing-impaired persons for use on the property of the campground, hotel, or recreational vehicle park. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.